Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1069YH (2) 91 dg/ko H.F. 61 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 10A.703 Disclosure of prices 1 charged for health services by health care providers and 2 hospitals. 3 1. A health care provider shall disclose and make available 4 to the public in a single document, either electronically or 5 by posting conspicuously on the providerâs internet site, 6 if one exists, the prices charged, prior to the negotiation 7 of any discounts and assuming no medical complications, for 8 the twenty-five most common health services the health care 9 provider renders. 10 a. The health care provider shall identify the health 11 service for which prices charged are provided in both a common 12 procedural terminology code or other coding system commonly 13 used by the health care provider and accepted as a national 14 standard for billing, and in a plain language description. 15 b. The health care provider shall update the price 16 information as frequently as the health care provider deems 17 appropriate, but at least annually. 18 2. A hospital shall disclose and make available to the 19 public in a single document, either electronically or by 20 posting conspicuously on the hospitalâs internet site, if 21 one exists, the prices charged, prior to the negotiation of 22 any discounts and assuming no medical complications, for 23 the seventy-five most common inpatient health services and 24 the seventy-five most common outpatient health services, as 25 grouped by a Medicare diagnosis-related group, rendered by 26 the hospital. The price information shall be updated on a 27 quarterly basis. 28 3. Any price information disclosed under this section shall 29 include a disclaimer that the price information provided is 30 an estimate, does not constitute a legally binding charge for 31 a health service provided to a specific consumer, and that 32 the actual charge for a health service is dependent on the 33 circumstances at the time the health service is rendered. 34 4. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 35 -1- LSB 1069YH (2) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 61 to ensure that requirements under this section are consistent 1 with and do not duplicate federal requirements related to the 2 disclosure of prices charged by health care providers and 3 hospitals including but not limited to the requirements for 4 hospitals pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Â§300gg-18(e). 5